Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10F-105] Directed suretyship;
coercion of contractors. (a) No person may require as a condition
precedent to the granting, awarding, or issuing a contract for the construction
or renovation of improvements to real property, that the person whose obligation
under such contract is to provide, construct, or renovate improvements to real
property is to acquire or negotiate a surety bond or other contract
guaranteeing completion of such improvements through a particular surety
insurer or group of surety insurers, or a particular producer or group of
producers.

(b) The commissioner may examine and
investigate the insurance related activities of any person whom the
commissioner believes may be in violation of this section. Any person may
submit to the commissioner a complaint or any material pertinent to the
enforcement of this section.

(c) Nothing in this section shall prevent a
person who grants, awards, or issues contracts for the construction or
renovation of improvements to real property from requiring a person to acquire
or negotiate a surety bond or other contract guaranteeing completion of the
improvements through authorized surety insurers or producers licensed to do
business in the State or both. [L 2007, c 251, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next